Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.6 The Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater Medical Marijuana Act
21-28.6-6.
Administration of departments of health and business regulation regulations.

The department of health shall issue registry identification cards to qualifying patients who submit the following, in accordance with the department’s regulations. Applications shall include but not be limited to:

Written certification as defined in §

21-28.6-3

;

Application fee, as applicable;

Name, address, and date of birth of the qualifying patient; provided, however, that if the patient is homeless, no address is required;

Name, address, and telephone number of the qualifying patient’s practitioner;

Whether the patient elects to grow medical marijuana plants for himself or herself; and

Name, address, and date of birth of one primary caregiver of the qualifying patient and any authorized purchasers for the qualifying patient, if any primary caregiver or authorized purchaser is chosen by the patient or allowed in accordance with regulations promulgated by the departments of health or business regulation.

The department of health shall not issue a registry identification card to a qualifying patient under the age of eighteen (18) unless:

The qualifying patient’s practitioner has explained the potential risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana to the qualifying patient and to a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the qualifying patient; and

A parent, guardian, or person having legal custody consents in writing to:

Allow the qualifying patient’s medical use of marijuana;

Serve as the qualifying patient’s primary caregiver or authorized purchaser; and

Control the acquisition of the marijuana, the dosage, and the frequency of the medical use of marijuana by the qualifying patient.

The department of health shall renew registry identification cards to qualifying patients in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of health and subject to payment of any applicable renewal fee.

The department of health shall not issue a registry identification card to a qualifying patient seeking treatment for post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) under the age of eighteen (18).

The department of health shall verify the information contained in an application or renewal submitted pursuant to this section, and shall approve or deny an application or renewal within thirty-five (35) days of receiving it. The department may deny an application or renewal only if the applicant did not provide the information required pursuant to this section, or if the department determines that the information provided was falsified, or that the renewing applicant has violated this chapter under their previous registration. Rejection of an application or renewal is considered a final department action, subject to judicial review. Jurisdiction and venue for judicial review are vested in the superior court.

If the qualifying patient’s practitioner notifies the department of health in a written statement that the qualifying patient is eligible for hospice care or chemotherapy, the department of health and department of business regulation, as applicable, shall give priority to these applications when verifying the information in accordance with subsection (e) and issue a registry identification card to these qualifying patients, primary caregivers and authorized purchasers within seventy-two (72) hours of receipt of the completed application. The departments shall not charge a registration fee to the patient, caregivers or authorized purchasers named in the application. The department of health may identify through regulation a list of other conditions qualifying a patient for expedited application processing.

Following the promulgation of regulations pursuant to §

21-28.6-5(c)

, the department of business regulation may issue or renew a registry identification card to the qualifying patient cardholder’s primary caregiver, if any, who is named in the qualifying patient’s approved application. The department of business regulation shall verify the information contained in applications and renewal forms submitted pursuant to this chapter prior to issuing any registry identification card. The department of business regulation may deny an application or renewal if the applicant or appointing patient did not provide the information required pursuant to this section, or if the department determines that the information provided was falsified, or if the applicant or appointing patient has violated this chapter under his or her previous registration or has otherwise failed to satisfy the application or renewal requirements.

A primary caregiver applicant or an authorized purchaser applicant shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or local police department for a national criminal records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in subsection (g)(5) of this section, and in accordance with the rules promulgated by the director, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information; and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, shall notify the department of business regulation or department of health, as applicable, in writing, that disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police shall inform the applicant and the department of business regulation or department of health, as applicable, in writing, of this fact.

The department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, shall maintain on file evidence that a criminal records check has been initiated on all applicants seeking a primary caregiver registry identification card or an authorized purchaser registry identification card and the results of the checks. The primary caregiver cardholder shall not be required to apply for a national criminal records check for each patient he or she is connected to through the department’s registration process, provided that he or she has applied for a national criminal records check within the previous two (2) years in accordance with this chapter. The department of health and department of business regulation, as applicable, shall not require a primary caregiver cardholder or an authorized purchaser cardholder to apply for a national criminal records check more than once every two (2) years.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department of business regulation or department of health may revoke or refuse to issue any class or type of registry identification card or license if it determines that failing to do so would conflict with any federal law or guidance pertaining to regulatory, enforcement, and other systems that states, businesses, or other institutions may implement to mitigate the potential for federal intervention or enforcement. This provision shall not be construed to prohibit the overall implementation and administration of this chapter on account of the federal classification of marijuana as a schedule I substance or any other federal prohibitions or restrictions.

Information produced by a national criminal records check pertaining to a conviction for any felony offense under chapter 28 of this title (“Rhode Island controlled substances act”); murder; manslaughter; rape; first-degree sexual assault; second-degree sexual assault; first-degree child molestation; second-degree child molestation; kidnapping; first-degree arson; second-degree arson; mayhem; robbery; burglary; breaking and entering; assault with a dangerous weapon; assault or battery involving grave bodily injury; and/or assault with intent to commit any offense punishable as a felony or a similar offense from any other jurisdiction shall result in a letter to the applicant and the department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, disqualifying the applicant. If disqualifying information has been found, the department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, may use its discretion to issue a primary caregiver registry identification card or an authorized purchaser registry identification card if the applicant’s connected patient is an immediate family member and the card is restricted to that patient only.

The primary caregiver or authorized purchaser applicant shall be responsible for any expense associated with the national criminal records check.

For purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty or a plea of guilty, those instances where the defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received a sentence of probation and those instances where a defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement with the attorney general.

The office of cannabis regulation may adopt rules and regulations based on federal guidance provided those rules and regulations are designed to comply with federal guidance and mitigate federal enforcement against the registrations and licenses issued under this chapter.

On or before December 31, 2016, the department of health shall issue registry identification cards within five (5) business days of approving an application or renewal that shall expire two (2) years after the date of issuance.

Effective January 1, 2017, and thereafter, the department of health or the department of business regulation, as applicable, shall issue registry identification cards within five (5) business days of approving an application or renewal that shall expire one year after the date of issuance.

Registry identification cards shall contain:

The date of issuance and expiration date of the registry identification card;

A random registry identification number;

A photograph; and

Any additional information as required by regulation of the department of health or business regulation as applicable.

Persons issued registry identification cards by the department of health or department of business regulation shall be subject to the following:

A qualifying patient cardholder shall notify the department of health of any change in his or her name, address, primary caregiver, or authorized purchaser; or if he or she ceases to have his or her debilitating medical condition, within ten (10) days of the change.

A qualifying patient cardholder who fails to notify the department of health of any of these changes is responsible for a civil infraction, punishable by a fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150). If the patient cardholder has ceased to suffer from a debilitating medical condition, the card shall be deemed null and void and the person shall be liable for any other penalties that may apply to the person’s nonmedical use of marijuana.

A primary caregiver cardholder or authorized purchaser shall notify the issuing department of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A primary caregiver cardholder or authorized purchaser who fails to notify the department of any of these changes is responsible for a civil infraction, punishable by a fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

When a qualifying patient cardholder or primary caregiver cardholder notifies the department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, of any changes listed in this subsection, the department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, shall issue the qualifying patient cardholder and each primary caregiver cardholder a new registry identification card within ten (10) days of receiving the updated information and a ten-dollar ($10.00) fee.

When a qualifying patient cardholder changes his or her primary caregiver or authorized purchaser, the department of health or department of business regulation, as applicable, shall notify the primary caregiver cardholder or authorized purchaser within ten (10) days. The primary caregiver cardholder’s protections as provided in this chapter as to that patient shall expire ten (10) days after notification by the issuing department. If the primary caregiver cardholder or authorized purchaser is connected to no other qualifying patient cardholders in the program, he or she must return his or her registry identification card to the issuing department.

If a cardholder or authorized purchaser loses his or her registry identification card, he or she shall notify the department that issued the card and submit a ten-dollar ($10.00) fee within ten (10) days of losing the card. Within five (5) days, the department of health or department of business regulation shall issue a new registry identification card with a new random identification number.

Effective January 1, 2019, if a patient cardholder chooses to alter his or her registration with regard to the growing of medical marijuana for himself or herself, he or she shall notify the department prior to the purchase of medical marijuana tags or the growing of medical marijuana plants.

If a cardholder or authorized purchaser willfully violates any provision of this chapter as determined by the department of health or the department of business regulation, his or her registry identification card may be revoked.

Possession of, or application for, a registry identification card shall not constitute probable cause or reasonable suspicion, nor shall it be used to support the search of the person or property of the person possessing or applying for the registry identification card, or otherwise subject the person or property of the person to inspection by any governmental agency.

Applications and supporting information submitted by qualifying patients, including information regarding their primary caregivers, authorized purchaser, and practitioners, are confidential and protected in accordance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as amended, and shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38 et seq. (Rhode Island access to public records act) and not subject to disclosure, except to authorized employees of the departments of health and business regulation as necessary to perform official duties of the departments, and pursuant to subsections (l) and (m).

The application for a qualifying patient’s registry identification card shall include a question asking whether the patient would like the department of health to notify him or her of any clinical studies about marijuana’s risk or efficacy. The department of health shall inform those patients who answer in the affirmative of any such studies it is notified of, that will be conducted in Rhode Island. The department of health may also notify those patients of medical studies conducted outside of Rhode Island.

The department of health and the department of business regulation, as applicable, shall maintain a confidential list of the persons to whom the department of health or department of business regulation has issued authorized patient, primary caregiver, and authorized purchaser registry identification cards. Individual names and other identifying information on the list shall be confidential, exempt from the provisions of Rhode Island access to public records, chapter 2 of title 38, and not subject to disclosure, except to authorized employees of the departments of health and business regulation as necessary to perform official duties of the departments and pursuant to subsections (l) and (m) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsections (k) and (m) of this section, the departments of health and business regulation, as applicable, shall verify to law enforcement personnel whether a registry identification card is valid and may provide additional information to confirm whether a cardholder is compliant with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations promulgated hereunder. The department of business regulation shall verify to law enforcement personnel whether a registry identification card is valid and may confirm whether the cardholder is compliant with the provisions of this chapter, or the cannabis control commission may verify if a sale is within the provisions of chapter 28.11 of title 21 and the regulations promulgated hereunder. This verification may occur through the use of a shared database, provided that any medical records or confidential information in this database related to a cardholder’s specific medical condition is protected in accordance with subsection (k)(1).

It shall be a crime, punishable by up to one hundred eighty (180) days in jail and a one thousand dollar ($1,000) fine, for any person, including an employee or official of the departments of health, business regulation, public safety, or another state agency or local government, to breach the confidentiality of information obtained pursuant to this chapter. Notwithstanding this provision, the department of health and department of business regulation employees may notify law enforcement about falsified or fraudulent information submitted to the department or violations of this chapter. Nothing in this act shall be construed as to prohibit law enforcement, public safety, fire, or building officials from investigating violations of, or enforcing state law.

On or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of each quarter of the fiscal year, the department of health and the department of business regulation shall report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate on applications for the use of marijuana for symptom relief. The report shall provide:

The number of applications for registration as a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, or authorized purchaser that have been made to the department of health and the department of business regulation during the preceding quarter, the number of qualifying patients, primary caregivers, and authorized purchasers approved, the nature of the debilitating medical conditions of the qualifying patients, the number of registrations revoked, and the number and specializations, if any, of practitioners providing written certification for qualifying patients.

On or before September 30 of each year, the department of health and the department of business regulation, as applicable, shall report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate on the use of marijuana for symptom relief. The report shall provide:

The total number of applications for registration as a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, or authorized purchaser that have been made to the department of health and the department of business regulation, the number of qualifying patients, primary caregivers, and authorized purchasers approved, the nature of the debilitating medical conditions of the qualifying patients, the number of registrations revoked, and the number and specializations, if any, of practitioners providing written certification for qualifying patients;

The number of active qualifying patient, primary caregiver, and authorized purchaser registrations as of June 30 of the preceding fiscal year;

An evaluation of the costs permitting the use of marijuana for symptom relief, including any costs to law enforcement agencies and costs of any litigation;

Statistics regarding the number of marijuana-related prosecutions against registered patients and caregivers, and an analysis of the facts underlying those prosecutions;

Statistics regarding the number of prosecutions against physicians for violations of this chapter; and

Whether the United States Food and Drug Administration has altered its position regarding the use of marijuana for medical purposes or has approved alternative delivery systems for marijuana.

After June 30, 2018, the department of business regulation shall report to the speaker of the house, senate president, the respective fiscal committee chairpersons, and fiscal advisors within 60 days of the close of the prior fiscal year. The report shall provide:

The number of applications for registry identification cards to compassion center staff, the number approved, denied and the number of registry identification cards revoked, and the number of replacement cards issued;

The number of applications for compassion centers and licensed cultivators;

The number of marijuana plant tag sets ordered, delivered, and currently held within the state;

The total revenue collections of any monies related to its regulator activities for the prior fiscal year, by the relevant category of collection, including enumerating specifically the total amount of revenues foregone or fees paid at reduced rates pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 2020, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 5, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 5, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.6-6.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 416, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 14, § 3, effective June 22, 2018.

21-28.6-7.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter shall not permit:

Any person to undertake any task under the influence of marijuana when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice;

The smoking of marijuana:

In a school bus or other form of public transportation;

On any school grounds;

In any correctional facility;

In any public place;

In any licensed drug treatment facility in this state; or

Where exposure to the marijuana smoke significantly adversely affects the health, safety, or welfare of children;

Any person to operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of any motor vehicle, aircraft, or motorboat while under the influence of marijuana. However, a registered qualifying patient shall not be considered to be under the influence solely for having marijuana metabolites in his or her system;

The operation of a medical marijuana emporium, which is expressly prohibited.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require:

A government medical assistance program or private health insurer or workers’ compensation insurer, workers’ compensation group self-insurer, or employer self-insured for workers’ compensation under §

28-36-1

to reimburse a person for costs associated with the medical use of marijuana; or

An employer to accommodate the medical use of marijuana in any workplace.

Fraudulent representation to a law enforcement official of any fact or circumstance relating to the medical use of marijuana to avoid arrest or prosecution shall be punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) which shall be in addition to any other penalties that may apply for making a false statement for the nonmedical use of marijuana.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-8.
Affirmative defense and dismissal.

Except as provided in §

21-28.6-7

, a qualifying patient may assert the medical purpose for using marijuana as a defense to any prosecution involving marijuana, and the defense shall be presumed valid where the evidence shows that:

The qualifying patient’s practitioner has stated that, in the practitioner’s professional opinion, after having completed a full assessment of the person’s medical history and current medical condition made in the course of a bona fide practitioner-patient relationship, the potential benefits of using marijuana for medical purposes would likely outweigh the health risks for the qualifying patient; and

The qualifying patient was compliant with this chapter and all regulations promulgated hereunder and in possession of a quantity of marijuana that was not more than what is permitted under this chapter to ensure the uninterrupted availability of marijuana for the purpose of alleviating the person’s medical condition or symptoms associated with the medical condition.

A person may assert the medical purpose for using marijuana in a motion to dismiss, and the charges shall be dismissed following an evidentiary hearing where the defendant shows the elements listed in subsection (a) of this section.

Any interest in, or right to, property that was possessed, owned, or used in connection with a qualifying patient’s use of marijuana for medical purposes shall not be forfeited if the qualifying patient demonstrates the qualifying patient’s medical purpose for using marijuana pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-9.
Enforcement.

If the department of health fails to adopt regulations to implement this chapter within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this act, a qualifying patient may commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the department to perform the actions mandated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the department of health or the department of business regulation fails to issue a valid registry identification card in response to a valid application submitted pursuant to this chapter within thirty-five (35) days of its submission, the registry identification card shall be deemed granted and a copy of the registry identification application shall be deemed a valid registry identification card.

The department of health and the department of business regulation shall revoke and shall not reissue the registry identification card of any cardholder or licensee who is convicted of; placed on probation; whose case is filed pursuant to §

12-10-12

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere; or whose case is deferred pursuant to §

12-19-19

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere for any felony offense under chapter 28 of this title (“Rhode Island controlled substances act”) or a similar offense from any other jurisdiction.

If a cardholder exceeds the possession limits set forth in §

21-28.6-4

or §

21-28.6-14

, or is in violation of any other section of this chapter or the regulations promulgated hereunder, he or she may be subject to arrest and prosecution under chapter 28 of this title (“Rhode Island controlled substances act”).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the director of the department of business regulation, or his or her designee, has cause to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations promulgated thereunder has occurred by a licensee or registrant under the department’s jurisdiction, or that any person or entity is conducting any activities requiring licensure or registration by the department of business regulation under this chapter or the regulations promulgated thereunder without such licensure or registration, or is otherwise violating any provisions of this chapter, the director, or his or her designee, may, in accordance with the requirements of the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42:

With the exception of patient and authorized purchaser registrations, revoke or suspend any license or registration issued under chapter 26 of title 2 or this chapter;

Levy an administrative penalty in an amount established pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation;

Order the violator to cease and desist such actions;

Require a licensee or registrant or person or entity conducting any activities requiring licensure or registration under this chapter to take those actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter and the regulations promulgated thereunder; or

Any combination of the above penalties.

If the director of the department of business regulation finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in his or her order, summary suspension of license or registration and/or cease and desist may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined.

All cannabis products that are held for sale or distribution within the borders of this state in violation of the requirements of this chapter are declared to be contraband goods and may be seized by the department of business regulation, the tax administrator, or his or her agents or employees, or by any sheriff, or his or her deputy, or any police officer when requested by the tax administrator or the department of business regulation to do so, without a warrant. All contraband goods seized by the state under this chapter may be destroyed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1.

21-28.6-11.
[Repealed.]